Maryland, session 2025, HB0794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE GRANT FUND.
Article – State Government
9.5–308.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION OR IMPROVEMENT” MEANS PLANNING, DESIGN,
ENGINEERING, ALTERATION, CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION, ENLARGEMENT,
EXPANSION, EXTENSION, IMPROVEMENT, REPLACEMENT, REHABILITATION,
RENOVATION, UPGRADING, REPAIR, OR CAPITAL EQUIPPING.
(3) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING.
(4) “ELIGIBLE GRANTEE” MEANS:

HOUSE BILL 794 3
(I) A TRIBE WITH MARYLAND INDIAN STATUS OR WITH LEGAL
RECOGNITION IN ANOTHER STATE; OR
(II) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION, TRIBE THAT IS INDIGENOUS
TO THE STATE, POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR STATE AGENCY IN CONSULTATION WITH
A STATE–RECOGNIZED TRIBE.
(5) “FUND” MEANS THE INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE GRANT
FUND.
(6) “INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE GRANT” MEANS A GRANT
MADE UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(7) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE
GRANT PROGRAM.
(8) “PROJECT” MEANS A CAPITAL PROJECT THAT ASSISTS AN
ELIGIBLE GRANTEE IN ACQUIRING LAND OR BUILDINGS OR THE CONSTRUCTION OR
IMPROVEMENT OF LAND OR BUILDINGS FOR:
(I) INDIAN TRIBAL AND CULTURAL ACTIVITIES;
(II) THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO INDIAN TRIBAL
COMMUNITIES; OR
(III) THE PRESERVATION OF BUILDINGS, COMMUNITIES, AND
SITES OF HISTORIC AND CULTURAL IMPORTANCE TO THE INDIAN EXPERIENCE IN
THE STATE.
(9) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF PLANNING.
(10) “TRUST” MEANS THE MARYLAND HISTORICAL TRUST
ESTABLISHED IN TITLE 5A, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS AN INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE GRANT PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST:
(I) INDIAN TRIBAL COMMUNITIES IN PRESERVING THEIR
HISTORY AND CULTURE; AND

HOUSE BILL 794
(II) NONPROFIT AND GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES WORKING IN
CONSULTATION WITH INDIAN TRIBES TO PRESERVE INDIAN HISTORY AND CULTURE.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE COMMISSION.
(C) (1) THERE IS AN INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE GRANT FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR INDIAN
HERITAGE AND CULTURE GRANTS.
(3) THE TRUST SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REVERSION UNDER § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) (I) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
1. MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO
THE PROGRAM;
2. INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND;
3. ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE
ACCEPTED FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND; AND
4. MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE SALE OF STATE
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS.
(II) THE FUND DOES NOT INCLUDE MONEY RECEIVED UNDER §
9.5–308 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR INDIAN HERITAGE AND
CULTURE GRANTS.
(7) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET AN APPROPRIATION OF $500,000 TO THE
FUND.

HOUSE BILL 794 5
(8) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(9) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE A DATE ESTABLISHED ANNUALLY BY THE TRUST
AND THE COMMISSION AND SUBJECT TO AVAILABILITY OF MONEY IN THE FUND, AN
INDIAN TRIBE, NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION, POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR STATE
AGENCY MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION FOR AN INDIAN HERITAGE AND CULTURE
GRANT TO THE TRUST.
(2) AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE SCOPE AND PURPOSE OF THE
PROJECT;
(II) A BUILDING PLAN THAT INCLUDES THE ESTIMATED TOTAL
COST OF THE PROJECT;
(III) IF THE ELIGIBLE GRANTEE IS A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION,
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, OR STATE AGENCY, A LETTER OF SUPPORT FROM AN
INDIAN TRIBAL ENTITY ATTESTING TO APPROPRIATE CONSULTATION WITH THAT
TRIBAL ENTITY; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE TRUST AND
THE COMMISSION.
(E) A GRANT MAY NOT EXCEED $250,000.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) REVIEW ALL GRANT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION, CONSIDER A GRANT APPLICATION COMPETITIVELY AGAINST ALL OTHER
GRANT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED DURING THE SAME FISCAL YEAR; AND

HOUSE BILL 794
(III) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING EACH APPLICATION
TO THE SECRETARY FOR THE AWARD OF GRANTS.
(2) IN MAKING RECOMMENDATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE PUBLIC NECESSITY AND URGENCY OF A PROJECT;
(II) THE NEED FOR ADDITIONAL SOURCES OF FUNDING FOR A
PROJECT;
(III) THE ESTIMATED COST AND TIMELINESS OF EXECUTING A
PROJECT;
(IV) GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY; AND
(V) ANY OTHER CRITERIA DETERMINED BY THE TRUST AND THE
COMMISSION TO BE RELEVANT.
(G) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(I) REVIEW EACH GRANT APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION AND THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMISSION;
(II) CONSIDER THE APPLICATIONS AND RECOMMENDATIONS
UNDER THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, MAKE A
FINAL DECISION TO AWARD THE GRANT OR DENY THE APPLICATION.
(2) THE SECRETARY MAY AWARD A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM
ONLY FOR A PROJECT.
(H) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE TRUST AND THE
COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE FINANCIAL STATUS AND
THE ACTIVITIES OF THE PROGRAM AND THE FUND FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.
(I) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE TRUST SHALL REQUIRE A PERSON AWARDED A GRANT TO ENTER INTO AN

HOUSE BILL 794 7
AGREEMENT TO PRESERVE AND MAINTAIN THE PROPERTY FOR WHICH THE GRANT
WAS AWARDED.
(2) IF THE PROPERTY IS HISTORIC REAL PROPERTY, THE AGREEMENT
SHALL BE A RECORDABLE HISTORIC PRESERVATION EASEMENT.
(3) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT AN AGREEMENT OR EASEMENT
IS IMPRACTICABLE, INFEASIBLE, OR NOT NECESSARY UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(J) THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.